Wisconsin, session 2025, SB710.
do enact as follows:SB710,11Section 1. 49.155 (1) (ag) of the statutes is amended to read:SB710,2,2249.155 (1) (ag) “Child care provider” means a any of the following: SB710,2,431. A provider licensed under s. 48.65, certified under s. 48.651, or established 4or contracted for under s. 120.13 (14).SB710,25Section 2. 49.155 (1) (ag) 2. of the statutes is created to read:SB710,2,6649.155 (1) (ag) 2. A provider in this state to which all of the following apply:SB710,2,97a. The provider operates in Indian country, as defined under 18 USC 1151, 8under the licensing or regulatory authority of a federally recognized American 9Indian tribe or band located in this state.SB710,2,1110b. The provider has entered into an agreement with the department to receive 11payments under this section.SB710,2,1712c. The provider and the tribe or band attest on a form prescribed by the 13department that the provider is operating under the tribe or band’s licensing or 14regulatory authority as a lead agency under 42 USC 9858 et seq. and 45 CFR Part 1598, meets the requirements for receiving payments from the federal child care and 16development fund program, and satisfies any other requirements established by the 17department by rule.SB710,318Section 3. 49.155 (4) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB710,3,21949.155 (4) (a) An eligible individual shall choose whether the child care will be 20provided by a child care center licensed under s. 48.65, a Level I certified family 21child care provider certified under s. 48.651 (1) (a), a Level II certified family child 22care provider certified under s. 48.651 (1) (b), or a child care program provided or 1contracted for by a school board under s. 120.13 (14), or a child care provider that 2meets the requirements under sub. (1) (ag) 2.SB710,3,33